North Dakota, session 69, HB1494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-27-03.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15.1-27-03.1. Weighted average daily membership - Determination.
1. For each school district, the superintendent of public instruction shall multiply by:
a. 1.00 the number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in an extended
educational program in accordance with section 15.1-32-17;
b. 0.60 the number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in a summer education
program, including a migrant summer education program;
c. 0.40 the number of full-time equivalent students who:
(1) On a test of English language proficiency approved by the superintendent of
public instruction are determined to be least proficient and placed in the first
of six categories of proficiencytest in the first, second, and third levels of
proficiency; and
(2) Are enrolled in a program of instruction for English language learners;
d. 0.280.10 the number of full-time equivalent students who:
(1) On a test of English language proficiency approved by the superintendent of
public instruction are determined to be more proficient than students placed
Page No. 1 25.1069.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
in the first of six categoriestest in the fourth level of proficiency and therefore
placed in the second of six categories of proficiency; and
(2) Are enrolled in a program of instruction for English language learners;
e. 0.25 the number of full-time equivalent students under the age of twenty-one
enrolled in grades nine through twelve in an alternative high school;
f. 0.20 the number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in a home-based
education program and monitored by the school district under chapter 15.1-23;
g. 0.17 the number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in an early childhood
special education program;
h. 0.15 the number of full-time equivalent students in grades six through eight
enrolled in an alternative education program for at least an average of fifteen
hours per week;
i. 0.10 the number of students enrolled in average daily membership, if the district
has fewer than one hundred students enrolled in average daily membership and
the district consists of an area greater than two hundred seventy-five square
miles [19424.9 hectares], provided that any school district consisting of an area
greater than six hundred square miles [155399 hectares] and enrolling fewer than
fifty students in average daily membership must be deemed to have an
enrollment equal to fifty students in average daily membership;
j. 0.088 the number of students enrolled in average daily membership, in order to
support the provision of special education services;
k. 0.070.40 the number of full-time equivalent students who:
(1) On a test of English language proficiency approved by the superintendent of
public instruction are determined to be more proficient than students placed
in the second of six categories of proficiency and therefore placed in theat
the third of six categorieslevel of proficiency;
(2) Are enrolled in a program of instruction for English language learners; and
(3) Have not been in the third of six categories of proficiency for more than
three years;
l. 0.025 the number of students representing that percentage of the total number of
students in average daily membership which is equivalent to the three-year
Page No. 2 25.1069.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
average percentage of students in grades three through eight who are eligible for
free or reduced lunches under the Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act
[42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq.];
m. 0.002 the number of students enrolled in average daily membership in a school
district that is a participating member of a regional education association meeting
the requirements of chapter 15.1-09.1;
n. 1.0 the number of students by which the district's September tenth enrollment
report exceeds the number of students in the prior year's average daily
membership; and
o. For districts paid based on September tenth enrollment in the prior year, 1.00 the
number of students determined by deducting the number of students in the prior
year's September tenth enrollment from the prior year's average daily
membership. If the prior year's September tenth enrollment exceeds the prior
year's average daily membership, then a deduction of 1.00 the number of excess
students.
2. The superintendent of public instruction shall determine each school district's weighted
average daily membership by adding the products derived under subsection 1 to the
district's average daily membership.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.
Page No. 3 25.1069.02000